Illinois, session 104th, SB2138.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 24-2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-2)7    Sec. 24-2. Exemptions. 8    (a) Subsections 24-1(a)(3), 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(10), and 924-1(a)(13) and Section 24-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of 10the following:11        (1) Peace officers, and any person summoned by a peace 12    officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the 13    peace, while actually engaged in assisting such officer.14        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 15    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 16    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense, 17    while in the performance of their official duty, or while 18    commuting between their homes and places of employment.19        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 20    the United States or the Illinois National Guard or the 21    Reserve Officers Training Corps, while in the performance 22    of their official duty.23        (4) Special agents employed by a railroad or a public   SB2138- 2 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    utility to perform police functions, and guards of armored 2    car companies, while actually engaged in the performance 3    of the duties of their employment or commuting between 4    their homes and places of employment; and watchmen while 5    actually engaged in the performance of the duties of their 6    employment.7        (5) Persons licensed as private security contractors, 8    private detectives, or private alarm contractors, or 9    employed by a private security contractor, private 10    detective, or private alarm contractor agency licensed by 11    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, 12    if their duties include the carrying of a weapon under the 13    provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 14    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 15    2004, while actually engaged in the performance of the 16    duties of their employment or commuting between their 17    homes and places of employment. A person shall be 18    considered eligible for this exemption if he or she has 19    completed the required 20 hours of training for a private 20    security contractor, private detective, or private alarm 21    contractor, or employee of a licensed private security 22    contractor, private detective, or private alarm contractor 23    agency and 28 hours of required firearm training, and has 24    been issued a firearm control card by the Department of 25    Financial and Professional Regulation. Conditions for the 26    renewal of firearm control cards issued under the   SB2138- 3 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    provisions of this Section shall be the same as for those 2    cards issued under the provisions of the Private 3    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 4    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 5    card shall be carried by the private security contractor, 6    private detective, or private alarm contractor, or 7    employee of the licensed private security contractor, 8    private detective, or private alarm contractor agency at 9    all times when he or she is in possession of a concealable 10    weapon permitted by his or her firearm control card.11        (6) Any person regularly employed in a commercial or 12    industrial operation as a security guard for the 13    protection of persons employed and private property 14    related to such commercial or industrial operation, while 15    actually engaged in the performance of his or her duty or 16    traveling between sites or properties belonging to the 17    employer, and who, as a security guard, is a member of a 18    security force registered with the Department of Financial 19    and Professional Regulation; provided that such security 20    guard has successfully completed a course of study, 21    approved by and supervised by the Department of Financial 22    and Professional Regulation, consisting of not less than 23    48 hours of training that includes the theory of law 24    enforcement, liability for acts, and the handling of 25    weapons. A person shall be considered eligible for this 26    exemption if he or she has completed the required 20 hours   SB2138- 4 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    of training for a security officer and 28 hours of 2    required firearm training, and has been issued a firearm 3    control card by the Department of Financial and 4    Professional Regulation. Conditions for the renewal of 5    firearm control cards issued under the provisions of this 6    Section shall be the same as for those cards issued under 7    the provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 8    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 9    2004. The firearm control card shall be carried by the 10    security guard at all times when he or she is in possession 11    of a concealable weapon permitted by his or her firearm 12    control card.13        (7) Agents and investigators of the Illinois 14    Legislative Investigating Commission authorized by the 15    Commission to carry the weapons specified in subsections 16    24-1(a)(3) and 24-1(a)(4), while on duty in the course of 17    any investigation for the Commission.18        (8) Persons employed by a financial institution as a 19    security guard for the protection of other employees and 20    property related to such financial institution, while 21    actually engaged in the performance of their duties, 22    commuting between their homes and places of employment, or 23    traveling between sites or properties owned or operated by 24    such financial institution, and who, as a security guard, 25    is a member of a security force registered with the 26    Department; provided that any person so employed has   SB2138- 5 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    successfully completed a course of study, approved by and 2    supervised by the Department of Financial and Professional 3    Regulation, consisting of not less than 48 hours of 4    training which includes theory of law enforcement, 5    liability for acts, and the handling of weapons. A person 6    shall be considered to be eligible for this exemption if 7    he or she has completed the required 20 hours of training 8    for a security officer and 28 hours of required firearm 9    training, and has been issued a firearm control card by 10    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 11    Conditions for renewal of firearm control cards issued 12    under the provisions of this Section shall be the same as 13    for those issued under the provisions of the Private 14    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 15    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 16    card shall be carried by the security guard at all times 17    when he or she is in possession of a concealable weapon 18    permitted by his or her firearm control card. For purposes 19    of this subsection, "financial institution" means a bank, 20    savings and loan association, credit union, or company 21    providing armored car services.22        (9) Any person employed by an armored car company to 23    drive an armored car, while actually engaged in the 24    performance of his duties.25        (10) Persons who have been classified as peace 26    officers pursuant to the Peace Officer Fire Investigation   SB2138- 6 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    Act.2        (11) Investigators of the Office of the State's 3    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor authorized by the board of 4    governors of the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 5    Prosecutor to carry weapons pursuant to Section 7.06 of 6    the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's Act.7        (12) Special investigators appointed by a State's 8    Attorney under Section 3-9005 of the Counties Code.9        (12.5) Probation officers while in the performance of 10    their duties, or while commuting between their homes, 11    places of employment or specific locations that are part 12    of their assigned duties, with the consent of the chief 13    judge of the circuit for which they are employed, if they 14    have received weapons training according to requirements 15    of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm 16    Training Act.17        (13) Court security officers Security Officers while 18    in the performance of their official duties, or while 19    commuting between their homes and places of employment, 20    with the consent of the sheriff Sheriff.21        (13.5) A person employed as an armed security guard at 22    a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site or 23    facility regulated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission 24    who has completed the background screening and training 25    mandated by the rules and regulations of the Nuclear 26    Regulatory Commission.  SB2138- 7 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1        (14) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of weapons 2    to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 3    (13.5) of this subsection to possess those weapons.4    (a-5) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 5to or affect any person carrying a concealed pistol, revolver, 6or handgun and the person has been issued a currently valid 7license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act at the time of 8the commission of the offense.9    (a-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 10to or affect a qualified current or retired law enforcement 11officer or a current or retired deputy, county correctional 12officer, court security officer, or correctional officer of 13the Department of Corrections qualified under the laws of this 14State or under the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety 15Act. 16    (b) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 1724-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of the following:18        (1) Members of any club or organization organized for 19    the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon 20    established target ranges, whether public or private, and 21    patrons of such ranges, while such members or patrons are 22    using their firearms on those target ranges.23        (2) Duly authorized military or civil organizations 24    while parading, with the special permission of the 25    Governor.26        (3) Hunters, trappers, or fishermen while engaged in   SB2138- 8 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    lawful hunting, trapping, or fishing under the provisions 2    of the Wildlife Code or the Fish and Aquatic Life Code.3        (4) Transportation of weapons that are broken down in 4    a non-functioning state or are not immediately accessible.5        (5) Carrying or possessing any pistol, revolver, stun 6    gun or taser or other firearm on the land or in the legal 7    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 8    person's permission. 9    (c) Subsection 24-1(a)(7) does not apply to or affect any 10of the following:11        (1) Peace officers while in performance of their 12    official duties.13        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 14    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 15    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense.16        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 17    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 18    the performance of their official duty.19        (4) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of machine 20    guns to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 21    (3) of this subsection to possess machine guns, if the 22    machine guns are broken down in a non-functioning state or 23    are not immediately accessible.24        (5) Persons licensed under federal law to manufacture 25    any weapon from which 8 or more shots or bullets can be 26    discharged by a single function of the firing device, or   SB2138- 9 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    ammunition for such weapons, and actually engaged in the 2    business of manufacturing such weapons or ammunition, but 3    only with respect to activities which are within the 4    lawful scope of such business, such as the manufacture, 5    transportation, or testing of such weapons or ammunition. 6    This exemption does not authorize the general private 7    possession of any weapon from which 8 or more shots or 8    bullets can be discharged by a single function of the 9    firing device, but only such possession and activities as 10    are within the lawful scope of a licensed manufacturing 11    business described in this paragraph.12        During transportation, such weapons shall be broken 13    down in a non-functioning state or not immediately 14    accessible.15        (6) The manufacture, transport, testing, delivery, 16    transfer, or sale, and all lawful commercial or 17    experimental activities necessary thereto, of rifles, 18    shotguns, and weapons made from rifles or shotguns, or 19    ammunition for such rifles, shotguns, or weapons, where 20    engaged in by a person operating as a contractor or 21    subcontractor pursuant to a contract or subcontract for 22    the development and supply of such rifles, shotguns, 23    weapons, or ammunition to the United States government or 24    any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, when 25    such activities are necessary and incident to fulfilling 26    the terms of such contract.  SB2138- 10 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1        The exemption granted under this subdivision (c)(6) 2    shall also apply to any authorized agent of any such 3    contractor or subcontractor who is operating within the 4    scope of his employment, where such activities involving 5    such weapon, weapons, or ammunition are necessary and 6    incident to fulfilling the terms of such contract.7        (7) A person possessing a rifle with a barrel or 8    barrels less than 16 inches in length if: (A) the person 9    has been issued a Curios and Relics license from the U.S. 10    Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; or 11    (B) the person is an active member of a bona fide, 12    nationally recognized military re-enacting group and the 13    modification is required and necessary to accurately 14    portray the weapon for historical re-enactment purposes; 15    the re-enactor is in possession of a valid and current 16    re-enacting group membership credential; and the overall 17    length of the weapon as modified is not less than 26 18    inches.19    (d) Subsection 24-1(a)(1) does not apply to the purchase, 20possession or carrying of a black-jack or slung-shot by a 21peace officer.22    (e) Subsection 24-1(a)(8) does not apply to any owner, 23manager, or authorized employee of any place specified in that 24subsection nor to any law enforcement officer.25    (f) Subsection 24-1(a)(4) and subsection 24-1(a)(10) and 26Section 24-1.6 do not apply to members of any club or   SB2138- 11 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting 2at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or 3private, while using their firearms on those target ranges.4    (g) Subsections 24-1(a)(11) and 24-3.1(a)(6) do not apply 5to:6        (1) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 7    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 8    the performance of their official duty.9        (2) Bonafide collectors of antique or surplus military 10    ordnance.11        (3) Laboratories having a department of forensic 12    ballistics, or specializing in the development of 13    ammunition or explosive ordnance.14        (4) Commerce, preparation, assembly, or possession of 15    explosive bullets by manufacturers of ammunition licensed 16    by the federal government, in connection with the supply 17    of those organizations and persons exempted by subdivision 18    (g)(1) of this Section, or like organizations and persons 19    outside this State, or the transportation of explosive 20    bullets to any organization or person exempted in this 21    Section by a common carrier or by a vehicle owned or leased 22    by an exempted manufacturer.23    (g-5) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to or affect 24persons licensed under federal law to manufacture any device 25or attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use 26in silencing the report of any firearm, firearms, or   SB2138- 12 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1ammunition for those firearms equipped with those devices, and 2actually engaged in the business of manufacturing those 3devices, firearms, or ammunition, but only with respect to 4activities that are within the lawful scope of that business, 5such as the manufacture, transportation, or testing of those 6devices, firearms, or ammunition. This exemption does not 7authorize the general private possession of any device or 8attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in 9silencing the report of any firearm, but only such possession 10and activities as are within the lawful scope of a licensed 11manufacturing business described in this subsection (g-5). 12During transportation, these devices shall be detached from 13any weapon or not immediately accessible.14    (g-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 1524-1.6 do not apply to or affect any parole agent or parole 16supervisor who meets the qualifications and conditions 17prescribed in Section 3-14-1.5 of the Unified Code of 18Corrections. 19    (g-7) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to a peace 20officer while serving as a member of a tactical response team 21or special operations team. A peace officer may not personally 22own or apply for ownership of a device or attachment of any 23kind designed, used, or intended for use in silencing the 24report of any firearm. These devices shall be owned and 25maintained by lawfully recognized units of government whose 26duties include the investigation of criminal acts.  SB2138- 13 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    (g-10) (Blank). 2    (h) An information or indictment based upon a violation of 3any subsection of this Article need not negate negative any 4exemptions contained in this Article. The defendant shall have 5the burden of proving such an exemption.6    (i) Nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 7affect the transportation, carrying, or possession, of any 8pistol or revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm 9consigned to a common carrier operating under license of the 10State of Illinois or the federal government, where such 11transportation, carrying, or possession is incident to the 12lawful transportation in which such common carrier is engaged; 13and nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 14affect the transportation, carrying, or possession of any 15pistol, revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm, not the 16subject of and regulated by subsection 24-1(a)(7) or 17subsection 24-2(c) of this Article, which is unloaded and 18enclosed in a case, firearm carrying box, shipping box, or 19other container, by the possessor of a valid Firearm Owners 20Identification Card.21(Source: P.A. 102-152, eff. 1-1-22; 102-779, eff. 1-1-23; 22102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; revised 237-22-24.) 24    Section 10. The County Jail Act is amended by changing 25Section 26.1 as follows:   SB2138- 14 -LRB104 03907 RLC 13931 b1    (730 ILCS 125/26.1)2    Sec. 26.1. Deputies, court security officers, and county 3correctional officers; coverage under the federal Law 4Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004. Deputies, court 5security officers, and county correctional officers shall be 6deemed to be qualified law enforcement officers or, if 7retired, shall be deemed qualified retired or separated law 8enforcement officers in Illinois for purposes of coverage 9under the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004 10and shall have all rights and privileges granted by that Act if 11the deputy, court security officer, or county correctional 12officer or retired deputy, court security officer, or county 13correctional officer is otherwise compliant with the 14applicable laws of this State governing the implementation and 15administration of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety 16Act of 2004 in the State of Illinois.17(Source: P.A. 102-779, eff. 1-1-23.)